Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-1402
Pilot program; provide resources; minimize harm; foster community trust and engagement.

The pilot program established pursuant to section 42-1401 shall:

(1) Provide comprehensive support resources to prevent youth from entering or escalating within the juvenile justice system;

(2) Minimize individual and community harm by addressing issues before they lead to greater involvement with social services, family services, and adult criminal justice systems; and

(3) Foster community trust and engagement by integrating culturally relevant services delivered by, and for, the communities served.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 2.